Tennessee statutes. Title 60 Oil And Gas
Chapter 2

Interstate Oil and Gas Compact [Repealed]

60-2-101— 60-2-107. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 2, §§ 60-2-101 — 60-2-107 (Acts 1947, ch. 44, §§ 1-7; modified; 1976, ch. 806, § 1 (64); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 60-301 — 60-307), concerning the interstate oil and gas compact, was repealed by Acts 1982, ch. 582, § 3.